New Jersey, session 222, A4669.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  It shall be an unlawful practice for any person, business, or entity to solicit an individual for business based on the print or electronic publication of a death notice or obituary, including from public records, of a family member or tenant residing on a property within the first 90 days of that publication. b.    A violation of this section shall be a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), and shall be subject to all remedies and penalties available pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.) in addition to any other remedies or penalties provided by law. c.     For the purposes of this section, "family member" means a spouse, child, parent, sibling, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, first cousin, grandparent, grandchild, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, or half-sister, whether the individual is related by blood, marriage, or adoption. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.